Utah statutes.
53A-1a-521.   Authorization of a charter school by a board of trustees of a
higher education institution.
(1)  Subject to the approval of the State Board of Education and except as
provided in Subsection (7), an individual or entity identified in Section 53A-
1a-504 may enter into an agreement with a board of trustees of a higher
education institution to establish and operate a charter school.
(2) (a)  An individual or entity identified in Section 53A-1a-504 applying for
authorization from a board of trustees of a higher education institution to
establish and operate a charter school shall provide a copy of the application
to the State Charter School Board and the local school board of the school
district in which the proposed charter school shall be located either before
or at the same time it files its application with the board of trustees.
(b)  The State Charter School Board and the local school board may review the
application and may offer suggestions or recommendations to the applicant or
the board of trustees of a higher education institution prior to its acting on
the application.
(c)  The board of trustees of a higher education institution shall give due
consideration to suggestions or recommendations made by the State Charter
School Board or the local school board under Subsection (2)(b).
(3) (a)  If a board of trustees of a higher education institution approves an
application to establish and operate a charter school, the board of trustees
shall submit the application to the State Board of Education.
(b)  The State Board of Education shall, by majority vote, within 60 days of
receipt of the application approve or deny an application approved by a board
of trustees of a higher education institution.
(c)  The State Board of Education's action under Subsection (3)(b) is final
action subject to judicial review.
(4)  The State Board of Education shall make a rule providing a timeline for
the opening of a charter school following the approval of a charter school
application by a board of trustees of a higher education institution.
(5) (a)  After approval of a charter school application, the applicant and the
board of trustees of a higher education institution shall set forth the terms
and conditions for the operation of the charter school in a written
contractual agreement.
(b)  The agreement is the school's charter.
(c) (i)  The school's charter may include a provision that the charter school
pay an annual fee for the board of trustees' costs in providing oversight of,
and technical support to, the charter school in accordance with Subsection
(6).
(ii)  An annual fee described in Subsection (5)(c)(i):
(A)  may not exceed the product of:
(I)  1% of the value of the weighted pupil unit as established in statute for
the current fiscal year; and
(II)  the October 1 enrollment count of the charter school for the current
fiscal year;
(B)  shall be paid to the board of trustees' higher education institution; and
(C)  shall be expended as directed by the board of trustees.
(6)  A board of trustees of a higher education institution shall:
(a)  annually review and evaluate the performance of charter schools
authorized by the board of trustees and hold the schools accountable for their
performance;
(b)  monitor charter schools authorized by the board of trustees for
compliance with federal and state laws, rules, and regulations; and
(c)  provide technical support to charter schools authorized by the board of
trustees to assist them in understanding and performing their charter
obligations.
(7) (a)  In addition to complying with the requirements of this section, a
campus board of directors of a college campus within the Utah College of
Applied Technology shall obtain the approval of the Utah College of Applied
Technology Board of Trustees before entering into an agreement to establish
and operate a charter school.
(b)  The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall establish
a policy for granting approval to a campus board of directors to enter into an
agreement to establish and operate a charter school.
